Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1921
Attorney-client privilege protected.

Nothing in sections 29-1912 to 29-1921 shall be construed to authorize any disclosure which would violate the attorney-client privilege.

Laws 1969, c. 235, § 10, p. 871.